Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Article 2. Inspections and Enforcement

§ 2741.
Milk plants.

Before issuing a milk handler’s license and at least twice a year thereafter, the Secretary shall inspect or cause to be inspected all milk plants as to their premises, equipment, procedures, and sanitary conditions. The Secretary may enter into reciprocal agreements with or accept the inspection reports of appropriate dairy sanitation agencies of other states, municipalities, or the federal government in lieu of inspection by the Secretary, provided their standards and administration are substantially equal to the standards established by the Secretary under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 5; amended

1969, No. 73

, § 4, eff. April 18, 1969;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2011, No. 39

, § 1, eff. May 19, 2011.

§ 2742.
Dairy farms.

Before a dairy farm may sell or offer for sale milk to a handler, and at least once a year thereafter, the Secretary shall inspect or cause to be inspected all dairy farms as to their premises, equipment, dairy animals, procedures, and sanitation conditions. He or she may enter into reciprocal agreements with or accept the inspection reports of appropriate dairy sanitation agencies of other states, municipalities, or the federal government in lieu of inspection by the Secretary, provided their standards and administration are substantially equal to the standards established by the Secretary under the provisions of this part. All milk producers shall comply with all state-federal-cooperative livestock disease control or eradication programs.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 6; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 29.

§ 2743.
Dairy laboratories.

The Secretary shall, at least annually, inspect or cause to be inspected all premises where dairy products are tested to determine the basis of payment or acceptance. Each handler shall notify the Secretary of the place in which tests of a producer’s dairy products are conducted. Such tests shall be performed only by licensed technicians. Approved dairy laboratories located outside Vermont are exempt from this inspection.

The Secretary shall at least annually inspect all in-state dairy laboratories and those out-of-state dairy laboratories not approved by the National Conference on Interstate Milk Shipments and if qualified, they shall be approved by the Secretary.

In the event that an approved dairy laboratory in which tests are made does not comply with the provisions of this part or regulations issued thereunder, the Secretary may forbid its use until subsequent inspection indicates compliance.

In case the producer’s milk is transported from the farm to a milk plant in another state, the samples shall be tested in an approved dairy laboratory.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 11; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2011, No. 39

, § 1, eff. May 19, 2011.

§ 2744.
Enforcement.

Enforcement of dairy sanitation regulations in milk plants. In the event that inspection of a milk plant discloses conditions not meeting the standards established in this part or the regulations promulgated thereunder, the handler shall be directed how to secure compliance with the terms of this part and the regulations thereunder. The Secretary shall allow a reasonable time to correct the unsatisfactory conditions. At the expiration of the time granted for correction another inspection shall be made. If conditions are then found in violation of this part or the regulations thereunder, the Secretary shall require the appearance of the handler before the Secretary to show cause why his or her handler license should not be suspended or terminated. In this event the handler shall give the Secretary a list of producers supplying him or her milk and the Secretary shall give notice to producers of the pending suspension.

Enforcement of dairy sanitation regulations on dairy farms. In the event that inspection of a dairy farm discloses conditions not meeting the standards established in this part or the regulations promulgated thereunder, the producer and the handler concerned shall be notified in writing clearly stating the unsatisfactory conditions. The producer shall be advised as how to secure compliance with the terms of this part and the regulations thereunder. The Secretary shall allow the producer a reasonable time to correct the unsatisfactory conditions. At the expiration of this time granted for correction or as soon as feasible thereafter, another inspection shall be made. If conditions are then found in violation of this part or the regulations thereunder, the Secretary shall require the producer to appear before him or her to show cause why his or her right to sell milk should not be suspended or terminated. If the producer’s right to sell milk is suspended or terminated, the Secretary shall then notify the appropriate handler to stop handling the milk from this producer. No other handler processing or packing fluid dairy products shall handle milk from this producer. In the event that a producer corrects the unsatisfactory conditions to the satisfaction of the Secretary as determined by inspection, the Secretary shall immediately notify the appropriate handlers.

Prohibition on sales or transfers. In the event that any inspection or test of a milk plant or dairy farm discloses conditions which are of immediate and serious danger to public health, the handler or the producer may be at once forbidden to sell or transfer dairy products for human consumption until a subsequent inspection or test indicates that the danger to public health no longer exists.

Right of entry. The Secretary or his or her agent may for the purpose of inspection enter at all reasonable times the premises, except the residence, of all milk handlers and producers and examine all pertinent records and personnel and may use reasonable means of determining the sanitary condition of the entire milk producing and handling process. Refusal to permit inspection shall be grounds for revoking a license or the ability to ship milk pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 7; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2011, No. 39

, § 1, eff. May 19, 2011.

§ 2744a.
Drugs.

No producer shall sell or offer for sale milk which contains any drug or drugs in excess of tolerances established by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration in the Code of Federal Regulations.

In the event that milk from a dairy producer contains a drug residue:

No more milk from that producer shall be received by any milk dealer or handler until a sample of at least one complete milking has been collected and found negative.

If a second drug residue violation occurs within 12 months of the first violation, no more milk from that producer shall be received by any milk dealer or handler until a sample of at least one complete milking has been collected and found negative. The producer shall have an administrative penalty equal to the value of one day of milk production assessed.

If a third drug residue violation occurs within 12 months of the first violation, no more milk from that producer shall be received by any milk dealer or handler until a sample of at least one complete milking has been collected and found negative. The producer shall have an administrative penalty equal to the value of two days of milk production assessed. A hearing shall be warned to determine if the producer will be allowed to continue to ship milk.

No handler or dealer shall accept milk from:

a producer after a drug residue violation has occurred until a sample of at least one complete milking has been found negative; or

a producer whose ability to sell milk is suspended or terminated.

A producer who fails to pay an administrative penalty issued under this section within 30 days of issuance of a citation for violation of this section shall have his or her ability to sell milk suspended until the administrative penalty is paid. In lieu of suspending a producer’s ability to sell milk, the Secretary may accept the assessment by the milk dealer against the producer.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, the Secretary may at any time issue an emergency order prohibiting a producer from selling and a handler from accepting any milk until the milk tests negative for drugs.

No producer shall sell for slaughter livestock with bodily tissue containing any drug or drugs in excess of tolerances established by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration in the Code of Federal Regulations.
(b) (1) No producer shall sell for slaughter livestock with bodily tissue containing any drug or drugs in excess of tolerances established by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration in the Code of Federal Regulations.

In the event that bodily tissue obtained from livestock intended for slaughter is found to contain a drug or drugs in excess of levels established by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration in the Code of Federal Regulations at the time of sale, the Secretary may assess an administrative penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for each violation and may require the farm to participate in a program approved by the Agency intended to mitigate further selling of animals for food that contain violative drug residues in their tissue.

Before issuing an order or administrative penalty under this section, the Secretary shall provide the producer and the handler or dealer an opportunity for hearing.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 232

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1997, No. 88

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2011, No. 39

, § 1, eff. May 19, 2011;

2015, No. 39

, § 18.